Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.315.315

Appeal.

(1) An appeal may be taken, as provided for in RCW 28A.645.010, to the superior court of the county in which a school district or any part thereof is situated on any question of adjustment of property and other assets and of liabilities provided for in this chapter. Judicial appeal must be expedited. If the court finds the terms of the adjustment in question not equitable, the court shall make an adjustment that is equitable.

(2) In the case of any financially insolvent school district that is required to transfer territory pursuant to RCW 28A.315.225, no lawsuit may be maintained challenging the imposition of excess tax levies on the territory transferred or annexed pursuant to an order of the superintendent of the educational service district under RCW 28A.315.215 unless that lawsuit is served and filed no later than thirty days after the date of the order.

[ 2012 c 186 s 15; 1990 c 33 s 305; 1983 c 3 s 34; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.120. Prior: 1947 c 266 s 40; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4693-59. Formerly RCW 28A.315.210, 28A.57.120, 28.57.120.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 186: See note following RCW 28A.315.025.

Boundary change, copy of decision to county assessor: RCW 28A.645.040.